Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-1465
Act; termination.

The Law Enforcement Attraction and Retention Act terminates on June 30, 2028.

Laws 2022, LB1241, § 12.
July 1, 2022June 30, 2028